Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Malt Beverages

244.480.
Sales of malt beverages when polls are open permitted in wet or moist territory — Power of local governments to regulate — Sunday sales.

Except as permitted by subsection (4) of this section, no brewer or distributor shall deliver any malt beverages on Sunday or between the hours of midnight and 6 a.m. on any other day.

Except as permitted by subsection (4) of this section, a licensee authorized to sell malt beverages at retail shall not sell, give away, or deliver any malt beverages between midnight and 6 a.m. or at any time during the twenty-four (24) hours of a Sunday.

A licensee authorized to sell malt beverages at retail may sell malt beverages during the hours the polls are open on a primary, or regular, local option, or special election day unless the licensee is located where the legislative body of an urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local government, city, or county, in which traffic in malt beverages is permitted by KRS Chapter 242 has adopted an ordinance after June 25, 2013, that prohibits the sale of alcoholic beverages or limits the hours and times in which alcoholic beverages may be sold within its jurisdictional boundaries on any primary, or regular, local option, or special election day.

This subsection shall only apply in a wet or moist territory.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, the fiscal court of a county shall not by ordinance or any other means:

Supersede, reverse, or modify any decision made pursuant to this subsection by the legislative body of a city within that county; or

Impose an action upon a city within that county when that city has taken no formal action pursuant to this subsection.

A licensee may sell or deliver malt beverages on Sunday and during the times and hours as permitted by a local ordinance of the legislative body of an urban-county government, consolidated local government, charter county government, unified local government, city, or county with local jurisdiction. The ordinance shall not prohibit the sale, gift, or delivery of any malt beverages between 6 a.m. and midnight during any day, except Sunday.

HISTORY:

2554b-207: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 28; 2016 ch. 80, § 18, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 109, effective June 29, 2017.

244.490.
Sales to persons illegally selling malt beverages prohibited.

No person shall sell any malt beverage to any person engaged in selling malt beverages in violation of the provisions of KRS Chapters 242, 243 and 244.

History.

2554b-211.

244.500.
Malt beverage premium prohibition — Exceptions.

Except as permitted by subsection (2) of this section, a licensee shall not offer or give anything tangible of value as a premium, gift, or prize for:

The return of caps, stoppers, corks, stamps, wrappers, coupons, or labels taken from any bottle, case, barrel, or package containing malt beverages; or

Any purpose in connection with the sale of malt beverages.

The following activities shall be permitted:

The return of moneys specifically deposited for the return of the original containers to the owners;

A premium, gift, or prize by brewers, wholesalers, or distributors to wholesalers, distributors, or their employees in connection with sales incentive programs;

Brewer-sponsored national sweepstakes in which major prizes, not including brand-related novelty items, are given to consumers based on certificates found in malt beverage packages or on point of sale materials. Malt beverage distributors, retail licensees, and their employees shall not be eligible to redeem the certificates or participate in the national sweepstakes;

The sale of malt beverages packaged in or securely bundled with brand-related novelty items if the price charged for the packaged or bundled malt beverages specifically includes the cost of the brand-related novelty item; and

Loyalty cards issued by retailers that reward customers with points or discounts for buying goods or services.

History.

2554b-206: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 104, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 359, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 99, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 62, § 110, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 102, § 14, effective July 15, 2020.

244.510.
Adoption of labeling and advertising regulations of Bureau of Internal Revenue.

The department may in its discretion adopt any regulations of the Bureau of Internal Revenue in the United States Department of the Treasury relating to labeling and advertising of malt beverages.

The adoption of regulations of the Bureau of Internal Revenue in the United States Department of the Treasury shall not become effective as to any brewer or distributor having labels on hand that would be outlawed by adoption of the regulation until a period of ninety (90) days from the date of adoption.

History.

2554b-215; 2010, ch. 24, § 598, effective July 15, 2010.

244.520.
Advertisement or label not to refer to alcoholic content. [Repealed.]

244.530.
Signs on premises. [Repealed.]

244.540.
Advertising malt beverages near school or church prohibited.

No licensee shall advertise any malt beverage by trade name, trade-mark or in any other manner within one hundred (100) feet of the property line of any school or church. The distance shall be by straight line.

Subsection (1) shall not apply to advertisements placed on the establishment of brewers or distributors in operation prior to March 7, 1938, nor to signs in position on March 7, 1938, nor to signs located in urban-county governments, cities of the first class, or cities containing a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census.

History.

2554b-208; 2014, ch. 92, § 302, effective January 1, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Validity, construction, and effect of statutes, ordinances or regulations prohibiting or regulating advertising of intoxicating liquors. 20 A.L.R.4th 600.

244.550.
Adulteration of malt beverages prohibited.

No person shall fortify, adulterate, contaminate or in any manner change the character or purity of the malt beverages from that as originally marketed by the brewer or sell, deliver or transport malt beverages except in the original containers.

History.

2554b-216: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 308, § 45.

244.560.
Brewer or distributor to make accurate invoice — Refund, rebate or discount prohibited.

No brewer or distributor, his agents or employees, shall make any sale or delivery of any malt beverage without a written invoice made concurrently with the sale or delivery, showing prices and conditions upon which the sale or delivery is made; make any invoice which falsely indicates prices and terms of any sale; insert in any invoice any statements which make the invoice a false record, wholly or in part, of the transaction involved or represented on the face of the invoice; or withhold from any invoice any statement which properly should be included in it so that in the absence of such a statement the invoice does not truly reflect the transaction involved.

No brewer or distributor shall make, directly or indirectly, through any agent or employee, and no retailer shall receive any payment of any allowance, rebate, refund, concession or discount, whether in the form of money or otherwise, that does not conform with the prices and conditions of sale shown on the invoice.

History.

2554b-218.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A District of Columbia based wholesaler does not have a right to give invoices to Kentucky distributors for beer picked up by the Kentucky distributor from distributors and retailers in other states.

OAG 80-629

.

244.570.
Brewer or distributor not to be financially interested in retail premises.

No brewer or distributor shall be interested in any manner, either directly or indirectly, in the ownership or leasehold of any property or in any mortgage against the property for which a retail license is issued, nor shall a brewer or distributor either directly or indirectly lend any moneys, credit or the equivalent thereto to any retailer in equipping, fitting out or maintaining and conducting either in whole or in part a malt beverage retail establishment or business.

Subsection (1) shall not apply to the interest of a brewer or distributor in any mortgage or other lien taken by him to secure the payment in whole or part of any indebtedness due him by any other licensee and incurred prior to March 7, 1938. It shall not prohibit a distributor from owning stock in a brewery.

History.

2554b-217.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An individual may be a major stockholder in a corporation holding a retail malt beverage license in Kentucky while also a major stockholder of a corporation holding a brewer’s or distributor’s license in another state since it is the corporations, and not the individual stockholder, whose mutual financial interests are precluded by this section.

OAG 80-312

.

Since this section prohibits any wholesale beer distributor or brewer from becoming financially interested in retail premises, the fact that the wholesaler or brewer is a nonresident is of no consequence.

OAG 80-312

.

The purpose of this section is clearly to prohibit brewers and distributors from becoming financially interested in retail malt beverage premises.

OAG 80-312

.

244.580.
Exclusive outlets prohibited.

No brewer, distributor or transporter of malt beverages shall require by agreement or otherwise, directly or indirectly or through an affiliate or subsidiary, that any retailer engaged in the sale of malt beverages, purchase malt beverages from him to the exclusion in whole or in part of malt beverages sold or offered for sale by other persons.

History.

2554b-212.

244.585.
Distributor of malt beverages not to sell outside his designated territory — Contract between distributor and supplier.

It shall be unlawful for any distributor to sell any brand or product name of malt beverage in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, except in the territory described in a written agreement between the supplier or brewer and distributor, authorizing sale by the distributor of that brand and product name within a designated area, and within that designated area the distributor shall not refuse to sell or offer reasonable service to licensed retailers during the normal business hours of the distributor. Where a supplier or brewer sells several brands and named products, the agreement need not apply to all brands and named products sold by the supplier or brewer and may apply to only one (1) brand and product name. No supplier or brewer shall provide by the written agreement for the distribution of a brand or named product of malt beverages to more than one (1) distributor for all or any part of the designated territory. Upon request, all territorial agreements shall be filed with the department.

Each distributor shall comply with current, written quality control standards as determined by the owner of the trademark of the brand of malt beverage, provided those controls are:

Normal industry practice;

Reasonably related to the maintenance of quality control;

Consistent with the provisions of this chapter and all administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter; and

Communicated to the distributor through written notice of them from the owner.

A distributor may sell to only those licensed retailers, religious, charitable, or fraternal organizations located within its designated geographical territory as provided in this section and to the distributor’s employees and to other distributors of the same brand. No brand or product name of malt beverage may be sold in the Commonwealth of Kentucky without prior written approval of the brewer and supplier filed with the department.

A territorial designation in any agreement between a distributor and brewer or supplier pursuant to this section shall be modified only in accordance with all the rights and duties of the distributor and brewer or supplier contained in any written agreement between them or by any other action of the brewer, supplier, or distributor that is consistent with the terms of their agreement, and this modification shall be filed pursuant to the provisions of this section. The board shall require each party to verify that the level of service within the designated territory will not be adversely affected by the modification. When a distributor is prevented from selling or servicing retailers within its territory due to natural disasters, labor disputes, or other causes beyond the distributor’s control, the distributor may allow another distributor of the same brand or named product of malt beverages to sell and service that brand within its territory upon approval of the brewer or supplier.

No provisions of any agreement shall expressly or impliedly establish or maintain the resale price of any brand or product name of malt beverage by the distributor.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 117, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 599, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 22, § 25, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 111, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Whether the vertical restraint created by this section violates the antitrust laws would depend on whether the restraint poses a significant injury to competition and the anti-competitive conduct clearly overrides any procompetitive redeeming benefit.

OAG 82-514

.

In enacting this section, the 1982 General Assembly clearly articulated its policy to supplant the free and open market determination of distributor arrangements by requiring a written agreement between the distributor and brewer or supplier which defines the distributor’s exclusive territory; however, the section fails to provide for adequate state supervision over this policy since the determination of the exclusive territories is accomplished by private parties rather than by the state and the state does not regulate or “police” the enforcement of these exclusive territorial arrangements entered into by private parties. Thus, even though the exclusive territories for distributors are required by this section, the arrangements are not immune from antitrust scrutiny under the state action doctrine; whether the conduct contemplated by the section violates the antitrust laws would depend upon the factual circumstances surrounding the particular arrangement and the existence of an illegal restraint of trade.

OAG 82-514

.

This section represents a vertical restraint between the brewer or supplier and the distributor by confining the distributor to a particular area of operation (plus various other restrictions relating to sale and quality control); these vertical nonprice restraints contained the potential to promote interbrand competition by allowing the manufacturer to achieve certain efficiencies in the distribution of his products and, moreover, society’s increasing demand that manufacturers directly assume responsibility for the safety and quality of their products constitutes a legitimate reason or justification for manufacturer control over the manner in which his product is sold. Accordingly, there is a rational relationship, for equal protection purposes, between the classification and the objectives justifying it; the statute also withstands a due process analysis in that it bears a reasonable relationship to the regulation of the sale of alcoholic beverages.

OAG 82-514

.

In order to effectuate the intent of this section and to construe subsection (3) of this section in harmony with the other subsections, the phrase “brewer and supplier” in the last sentence of subsection (3) must be interpreted as “brewer or supplier” and thus subsection (3) must be interpreted to require the prior written approval of the supplier or brewer for the sale of a particular brand of malt beverage.

OAG 82-572

.

244.590.
Brewer or distributor prohibited from offering certain inducements to retailers — Brewer or distributor may furnish advertising matter or cleaning service to retailer — Retailer not to demand violation of this section — Sampling events not a violation of this section.

No brewer or distributor shall induce through any of the following means any retailer selling malt beverages by the package or drink to purchase any malt beverages from that brewer or distributor to the exclusion in whole or in part of malt beverages sold or offered for sale by other persons:

By acquiring or holding, after the expiration of any existing license, any interest in any license with respect to the premises of the retailer;

By acquiring any interest in real or personal property owned, occupied, or used by the retailer in the conduct of the retailer’s business;

By furnishing, giving, renting, lending, or selling to the retailer, any equipment, fixtures, signs, supplies, money, services, or other things of value, except as the malt beverages administrator, having regard for the public health, the quantity and value of the articles involved, the prevention of monopoly, and the practice of deception, may permit through the promulgation of an administrative regulation;

By paying or crediting the retailer for any advertising, display, or distribution service subject to the exceptions that the board may permit through the promulgation of an administrative regulation;

By guaranteeing any loan or the repayment of any financial obligation of the retailer; or

By requiring the retailer to take and dispose of a certain quota of any malt beverages.

Notwithstanding any provisions in KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and this section, a brewer or distributor may:

Give, rent, loan, or sell to any retailer selling malt beverages by the package or drink signs, posters, placards, designs, devices, decorations, or graphic displays bearing advertising matter and for use in windows or elsewhere in the interior of a retail malt beverage establishment; and

Provide or furnish draught-line cleaning or coil-cleaning service to a nonquota retail malt beverage package licensee either directly or indirectly with the consent of the distributor.

A retailer shall not require or demand that a brewer or distributor violate this section.

Sampling events conducted under KRS 243.0307(2)(d) shall not be a violation of this section.

History.

2554b-213: amend. Acts 2004, ch. 120, § 4, effective July 13, 2004; 2013, ch. 121, § 97, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 25, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 112, effective January 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 102, § 15, effective July 15, 2020.

244.600.
Commercial bribery and other inducements unlawful.

No brewer shall induce through any of the following means, any retailer selling malt beverages by the package or drink to purchase any malt beverage products from him or her to the exclusion in whole or in part of malt beverages sold or offered for sale by other persons, if the brewer engages in the practice of using such means, or any of them, to such an extent as substantially to restrain or prevent transactions in malt beverages:

By commercial bribery;

By offering or giving any bonus, premium, or compensation to any officer, employee, or representative of the retailer; or

By making or allowing any rebates or refunds to any officer, employee, or representative of the retailer.

Sampling events conducted under KRS 243.0307(2)(d) shall not be a violation of this section.

History.

2554b-214: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 98, effective June 25, 2013; 2020 ch. 102, § 16, effective July 15, 2020.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Commercial bribery, Penal Code, KRS

518.020

.